Washington statutes.
RCW 36.81.110

County road on or over dikes—Condemnation for dike roads.

If any offer of damages to any diking, or diking and drainage, district is not accepted in the manner provided by law, it shall be deemed rejected, and the board by order, shall direct condemnation proceedings to procure the right-of-way to be instituted in the superior court of the county by the prosecuting attorney in the manner provided by law for the taking of private property for public use, and to that end the board may institute and maintain in the name of the county such proceedings against the diking, or diking and drainage, district and the owners of any land on which the dike is located and that have failed to accept the offer of damages made by the board: PROVIDED, That no taxes or assessments shall be charged or collected by any diking, or diking and drainage, district for any county road as provided in this section.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.81.110. Prior: 1937 c 187 s 16; RRS s 6450-16.]